src/scripts/Slovak/g2p.foma
define teExceptions [t e] @-> [ŧte] || [b a hh] | {es} | {en} | {fil} | {gis} | {ia} | [i ŧni s] | {katas} | {klas} | {lis} | {mas} | {mis} | {pe} | {se} | {sve} | [t e aa] _ r , _ {nis} | [r a j sh] | {restri} | [ks] , {syn} | {zavia} _ , .#. _ [d a j sh] | [hh] | {lec} | {lef} | {leg} | {lek} | {lem} | {leo} | {lep} | {ler} | {lesk} | {lesen} | {leter} | {lev} | {mp} | {nd} | {nto} | o | [oo] | {rap} | {ras} | [r ee n] | [r ee z] | [r ts] | {rez} , [e ks i s] _ n , {fo} | {ho} | {kura} | .#. {nu} | {kar} _ l , {arak} | {arac} _ r , .#. {in} _ l | n , {kompe} _ n , _ {mati} , {ma} _ {ria} , {ma} _ [r i aa] , {stra} _ g , {lia} | {pia} | {hria} | {sia} | {via} | [n aa s] _ .#. , {me} _ r .#. , v _ [d a j sh] , {de} _ [k t ii v] , {in} _ {rn} , {al} _ r , .#. {dein} | {pas} | [v a l] _ , [a r hh i] _ k , .#. {pa} _ {nt} , {sep} _ {mb} , [ee] _ r , {asis} _ n , [v sh e] _ [ts] , [ŧde] _ k , _ {ho} .#. | s .#. , .#. {ka} _ d | g , _ {raz} , {ka} _ [hh] , {al} _ [r n a t ii v] , _ {rm} | {st} , {arak} _ r , [e ks] _ r , .#. {tele} _ r , .#. {po} _ n , {in} | {li} _ r , {sys} _ m , {al} _ {rn} , v _ {dy} , {la} _ {nc} | {nt} | [n ts] , .#. _ [n .#.] | [n t o .#.] , _ {da} .#. , _ {mer} , {tam} _ n , {to} _ m | n , _ {jto} .#. , {me} _ o , .#. _ l .#. , {in} _ g , {ve} _ {rin} , .#. _ {lk} | {rk} , {ba} _ {rk} , _ [hh n] | [hh ŧni] | [hh ŧne] , {ve} _ [r aa n] , _ {lenov} , _ [n ŧde n c] | [n ŧde n ts] , o _ {rap} , _ [s l [a | u | e | y | ou | [o u]]] , _ [h e r aa n] , _ [ŧni s] , {sa} _ {lit} , _ [a t] | [aa t] , {najin} _ [n z ii v] , _ {nor} | {rorist} | {roriz} | {rory} | {roru} | {rorov} | {rorom} | {rore} | [r o r o hh] | {rormi} | [r o r .#.] , .#. _ [r n o .#.] | [r n aa] | [r n a .#.] | [r n .#.] | [r n u .#.] | [r n e .#. ] | {rnom} | {rnami} , [s k uu] _ r , [k r aa] _ r , {konzis} _ {nt} | {nc} | [n ts] , [ŧde] _ {gov} | {guj} , {bak} _ {ri} , [p e ŧdi a] _ r , .#. | [ae] | {avre} | {boha} | {esi} | {ia} | {knu} | [k o sh a] | {le} | {oli} | [lj a] | [n aa s] | {pnu} | {rna} | {zla} _ j .#. , [zh i] | {nu} | [ts u] | [hh a] | {pa} | {my} | {da} | {ija} | {ka} | {ina} | [ts n a] _ j .#. , {ra} | {sa} | {ta} | [ts a] | [nj a] | {bde} | [zh a] | {pe} | [\.#. t r e] _ j .#. , {pre} | {zre} | {hni} | {pi} | {vi} | [sh i] | {by} | {ky} _ j .#. , {kry} | {ri} | {vr} | {ies} | [zh l] | {am} | {en} | [oo n] | {is} | {os} | {du} | [aa] | [sh] | {as} _ j .#. , .#. _ {dy} .#. , {pro} _ [ii | k | o | t | zh] \.#. , _ [[ts o v a] | [ts u j] | [ts uu v a]] , {su} _ [r ee n] , [sh i e s] _ .#. , {hypo} _ , {repe} _ , {ezo} _ {ri} , {es} _ {ti} , [u r ts i] _ j , _ {lef} , {pro} _ {kt} , {in} _ [n z ii v] , {re} _ {nc} | [n ts] , {fila} _ {li} , {pa} _ {tik} | {tick} , {au} _ {nti} , {la} _ [r aa l] , .#. _ {nzi} , _ {nzo} , .#. s _ {re} , [e sh] _ [b aa] , {majs} _ r , s _ {p} [[o v] | {uj}] , e _ [r ŧni t] , .#. {ams} _ l | r , {cis} _ {rci} , a _ [l i ee r] | [n t aa t] , _ {lugs} | [l u g ts] , {kvar} | {kvin} | {seks} | {sep} | {ok} _ t , [.#. o s] _ o ; 
define teForeignExceptions [t e] @-> [ŧte] || [rz ?*] _ , _ [?* rz] ; 
define tiPrerules [t i] @-> [tj i]|| [aa sh] | [uu sh] | [uu s] | {ies} _ k .#. ; 
define tikapart1 {pa} | {ma} | {sta} | [s ŧte] | {tal} | {man} | {men} | {pia} | {uva} | [ŧne] | [ŧte n] | [p a ŧte] | {robo} | {go} | y | {vol} ; 
define tikapart2 {bio} | {ero} | [s hh o l a s] | {plas} | {mas} | {nas} | {ges} | {ornamen} | [ŧni s] | {polonis} | {gnos} | {kaus} | {ru} | {nau} | {peu} | {pranos} ;
define tikaending [k a .#.] | [k y .#.] | [k e .#.] | [k aa m .#.] | [k u .#.] | [k o m .#.] | [k o v .#.] | [k o v i .#.] | [k o u .#.] | [k a m i .#.] | [k m i .#.] | [k aa hh .#.] | [k o hh .#.] | [a .#.] | [e .#.] | [ii .#.] | [u .#.] | [aa m .#.] | [u .#.] | [i .#.] | [aa hh .#.] | [o u .#.] | [a m i .#.] ;
define tiExceptions [t i] @-> ŧti|| \[[aa] | [ee] | [oo] | [uo] | [uu] | p] _ k .#. , _ {ng} .#. , _ {tul} , {abs} | {apa} | {atlan} | {sofis} _ , {automa} | {cer} | [ŧdi a g n o s] _ \.#. , {didak} | [ŧdi d a k] | {ek} | [e ks o] | {ema} | {farmaceu} _ , [f o ŧne] | {herme} | [hh a r a k ŧte r i s] | {ins} | [i n sh] | {inves} | {kon} _ , [k o n sh] | {kozme} | {kul} | [m a g ŧne] | [m a ŧte m a] | {mul} _ , {niko} | {produk} | {rk} _ , {sensi} | [s y n ŧte] | [sh t a] | [sh t a t i s] _ , [ŧte m a] | {ver} _ , {komple} | {konkre} | {kri} _ z , a _ z , {li} | n | {tas} | [\k y] _ c , {ama} | {ak} | {ep} | [hh a] | [hh a o] | {kri} | {mo} _ c | [k VowelPhonem] , \hh _ {ck} , {sa} _ r | s , {pres} _ [zh] , s _ {mul} , .#. _ {motej} | {ran} | [r aa zh] , .#. [r e sh] _ , [t e ks] _ l , .#. {pu} _ k , {ven} _ l , {ma} _ k , e _ {ck} | k | [oo p] , _ {zme} .#. | {zmom} .#. | {zmu} .#. | {zmus} .#. | {vizme} .#. | {vizmom} .#. | {vizmu} .#. | {vizmus} .#. , {en} _ n , a _ {ck} , .#. _ {tan} , [sh] _ {pen} , {ak} | {mo} _ v , n _ n , {an} _ [k aa] , {mar} _ n , {ahnu} | {ihnu} _ .#. , .#. _ e .#. | {eto} .#. , .#. _ p .#. | {py} .#. | {pu} .#. | {pov} | {po} | {pe} .#. | {pmi} .#. , {kris} _ [aa] , {pe} _ [ts n] , _ {mea} | {mei} | [m e ii] | [m e aa m] | [m e u] | [m e aa hh] | {meou} | {meami} , .#. {an} _ , _ {ger} | {gr} , {fes} _ {val} , .#. {des} _ , .#. {jus} _ , .#. {kons} _ , .#. [a n ŧti p a] _ , {poli} _ c | k , .#. {ak} _ , {cen} _ \ShortVowelPhonem , {empa} _ , .#. {in} _ m , {marke} _ {ng} , [ŧde s] _ l , s _ {gm} .#. , .#. _ [n [ou | [o u] | a | y | e | u]] .#. , [ŧde s] _ [n aa c i] , [ŧdi a k r i] _ , {kompa} _ {bil} , [ŧdi u r e] _ , .#. _ {bor} , {poli} _ [ts] , {aser} _ v , [\z i ŧde n] _ , {ar} _ {kul} , {uris} _ k , {eklip} _ k , _ {bet} , {mo} | {kri} _ [ts k] | {km} , {aris} _ k , [ŧde n] _ {fik} , {prak} _ {zuj} | {zov} , {fantas} _ {ka} | {ky} | {ke} | {ku} | [k aa] , {no} _ {fik} , {ges} _ {kul} , {bas} _ [aa n] , {absolu} _ {zm} , [ŧde n] _ t , {kvan} _ f , {akus} | [g e ŧne] _ k , {repe} _ , {fe} _ sh , _ {ramis} , {op} | {par} _ \ts & \l , [p r o ŧte] _ k | c , {narko} _ c | k , [ŧte ks] _ l , _ {cizm} , {aske} | {be} | {drama} | [.#. e] | {ero} | [e s ŧte] | {fana} | {fili} | {fone} | {forma} | {ge} | [g e ŧne] | {gma} | {gnos} _ [ts k [a | y | e | u | [o u] | [aa m] | [aa hh] | [a m i]] .#.] | [ts i e k .#.] , {kep} | {kulo} | {lek} | {lep} | {ly} | {man} | {mio} | {mis} | {mizma} | {noe} _ [ts k [a | y | e | u | [o u] | [aa m] | [aa hh] | [a m i]] .#.] | [ts i e k .#.] , o | {opa} | [.#. o p] | {ore} | [o ŧte] | {reuma} | {rne} | {ro} | {sta} | {tak} | {tma} | {ylis} _ [ts k [a | y | e | u | [o u] | [aa m] | [aa hh] | [a m i]] .#.] | [ts i e k .#.] , s _ {gma} , {balis} _ \e , {ra} _ {fik} , {vy} _ {pov} , {pija} _ c | k , {is} _ [k a .#.] | [k y .#.] | [k e .#.] | [k aa m] | [k u .#.] | [k aa hh] | {kou} | {kami} , _ {ptop} | [p u j] , 
tikapart1 _ tikaending , 
tikapart2 _ tikaending , 
{bas} | {flo} | [.#. o] | {tor} _ {la} | {ly} | {le} | [l aa m] | {lu} | {le} | [l aa hh] | {lou} , {ar} _ s , _ [f i k aa] | {fiko} | {fiku} , s _ [oo n] , {ul} _ [m aa t] , {krea} _ {vi} , {spas} _ c , {va} _ [k aa n] , {ves} _ {bul} , .#. {peripe} _ , {kan} _ [l aa] | [l ee] | {la} | {lu} | {lo} , [b e sh] _ a | aa | e | u | i | o , {lokaga} _ ; 
define tiExceptions2 [t i] @-> ŧti|| {ra} _ {fik} , {pale} | {poli} _ z ; 
define tiForeignExceptions [t i] @-> [ŧti] || [rz ?*] _ , _ [?* rz] ; 
define tiiExceptions [t ii] @-> [ŧtii] || {preven} _ v , {detek} | {dif} | {ek} | {sensi} | {vyknu} _ , {teris} _ k , _ {mov} , a | {ak} | {alterna} | {audi} | {defini} | i | [k o n sh t r u k] | {mo} | {nega} | {produk} | {spek} | [t u] _ v , .#. {jus} | {pales} _ , {or} _ m , {ales} _ t , .#. _ [m .#.] | {mo} | {mu} , {hnu} | {li} _ .#. , .#. _ .#. | {to} .#. , {kris} _ n , _ [ŧne dzh] , {pe} _ {ci} , [ŧni] _ , _ {mea} | {mei} | [m e ii] | [m e aa m] | [m e u] | [m e aa hh] | {meou} | {meami} , .#. _ m , {legi} _ m , {adap} | {adop} _ v , .#. {in} _ m , [ŧde ŧte k] _ v , {argen} _ n , [hh a r a k ŧte r i s] _ k , [z zh i] _ , {aser} _ v , [ks e k u] _ , {antark} _ d , [k o n sh] _ {nopo} , [ŧde n] _ t , .#. {boha} _ .#. , [p r e ŧdi k] _ v , {poli} _ k , {fik} _ v , {opi} | {pripi} | {prepi} | {spi} | {spros} _ .#. , {repe} _ , [k o n sh ŧti t u] _ v , {is} _ k .#. , tikapart1 _ [k .#.] , tikapart2 _ [k .#.] , {flo} | {tor} _ l , {par} _ c , {ape} _ t , [ŧde sh t r u k] _ v , {pres} _ [zh] , [k o n sh t a n] _ n , {atlan} _ d , {inves} _ c ; 
# These tii rules are questionable: {os} _ k , breaks podujatí {ja} _ .#. , 
define rules [d i]:[dj i] | [t i]:[tj i] | [n i]:[nj i] | [l ii]:[lj ii] | [l i]:[lj i] | [d e]:[dj e] | [t e]:[tj e] | [n e]:[nj e] | [l e]:[lj e] | [d ii]:[dj ii] | [n ii]:[nj ii] | [t ii]:[tj ii] ; 
define exceptionsEnd [ŧde] @-> [d e] || _ ,, [ŧdii] @-> [d ii] || _ ,, [ŧdi] @-> [d i] || _ ,, [ŧne] @-> [n e] || _ ,, [ŧnii] @-> [n ii] || _ ,, [ŧni] @-> [n i] || _ ,, [ŧte] @-> [t e] || _ ,, [ŧtii] @-> [t ii] || _ ,, [ŧti] @-> [t i] || _ ; 
